public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A ervelar arvelarisense [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarision/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisionse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisié/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisiéu/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarison/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarisonse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarié/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelariéu/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaron/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaronse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarà/SOK [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaràe/S [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarè/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarèmi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaré/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarémoni/N [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarésimo/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarésimoni/N [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaréu/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaría/SKO [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríami/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríatu/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríe/SK [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríelo/T [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaríemi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelarò/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaròmi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelase/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelasi [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelasta/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelaste/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelasti/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelasto/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelava/SQK [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelavau/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelave/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelavi/QO [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelavo/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelede [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelege [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelemo/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelen/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelendo/E [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelene [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelense [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelese/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelesi [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelesta/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveleste/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelesti/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelesto/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveleva/SQK [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelevau/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveleve/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelevi/QO [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelevo/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelion/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelione [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelionse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisen/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisene [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisense [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelision/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisione [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisionse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisié/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisiéde/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisiége/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelison/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisone [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelisonse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveliven/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelivense [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelivion/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelivionse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelivié/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveliviéu/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelivon/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelivonse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelié/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveliéde/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveliége/Q [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveliéu/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelon/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelone [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelonse [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelà [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàa/KQS [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàami/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàau/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàe/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàelo/T [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàemi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelài/OQ [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàimo/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàimoni/N [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàitu/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàndo/HG [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelào/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàomi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàr/H [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàsimo [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàvami/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàvelo/T [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàvemi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàvimo/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàvimoni/N [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàvitu/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelàvomi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelè [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelè/IFQ [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelèu/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelé/FQ [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléa/SQK [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléami/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléau/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelée/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléelo/T [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléemi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléi/QO [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléimo/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléimoni/N [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléitu/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelémo [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelémoni/N [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléndo/HG [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléo/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléomi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelésimo [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arveléu/R [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelévami/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelévelo/T [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelévemi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelévimo/M [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelévimoni/N [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelévitu/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvelévomi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèla/FIS [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèle [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèle/JSK [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèlelo/T [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèlemi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèli [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèli/O [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèlitu/P [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèlo/K [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervelar arvèlomi/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ervertir arvarta pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaralo/T pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarami/L pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaratu/P pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarave/SU pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaremo/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaren/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarense pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaresi/Q pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaresiu/R pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarion/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarionse pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarisen/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarisense pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarision/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarisionse pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarisié/Q pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarisiéu/R pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarison/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarisonse pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarié/Q pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartariéu/R pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaron/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaronse pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarà/SOK pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaràe/S pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarè/K pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarèmi/L pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaré/Q pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarémoni/N pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarésimo/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarésimoni/N pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaréu/R pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaría/SKO pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaríami/L pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaríatu/P pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaríe/SK pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaríelo/T pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaríemi/L pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartarò/K pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartaròmi/L pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvarte/JKS pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartede pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartege pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartelo/T pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartemi/L pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvarten/M pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartendo/E pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartene pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartense pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartente pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartese/J pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartesi pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartesta/J pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvarteste/J pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartesti/J pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvartesto/J pervertir
SFX A ervertir arvarteva/SQK pervertir
