public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
alar/A
alterar/A
inanelar/A
inarđentar/A
artikolar/A
aŧelerar/A
axear/A
bagatelar/A
inbakukir/A
xbaliđar/A
inbalukar/A
xbanpir/A
barbajar/A
barufar/A
bateđar/A
dexbaular/A
xbefar/A
xberegar/A
strabéver/A
xbiankiđar/A
skonbinar/A
inbisakar/A
bocar/A
dexbokar/A
inbolsamar/A
inbonbaxar/A
bordiđar/A
inbotir/A
inboxemar/A
xbraɉar/A
braŧar/A
dexbriagar/A
inbrodar/A
brovar/A
inbrunar/A
inbugar/A
inbuŧolar/A
recamar/A
descavar/A
intracèñer/A
océñer/A
cincinar/A
benedir/A
indanar/A
xdentar/A
indevenar/A
indivinar/A
doɉiđar/A
predomenar/A
indormir/A
drapar/A
kondúxer/A
đenerar/A
sođónxer/A
ebraiđar/A
adenpir/A
espèler/A
exentar/A
putrefar/A
faelar/A
falivar/A
infantar/A
faturar/A
falsifegar/A
sofegar/A
fenestrar/A
referir/A
dexenfetar/A
sfiamegar/A
fidar/A
desfikar/A
rafinar/A
sfioređar/A
fitar/A
foderar/A
foɉar/A
fondamentar/A
reformar/A
raforŧar/A
sfrakasar/A
franŧexar/A
fraudar/A
frèmer/A
frixar/A
frustar/A
sfumar/A
futuriđar/A
ingalar/A
inganar/A
garantir/A
xgardufar/A
ingavetar/A
dexgobar/A
gongolar/A
degradar/A
xgranar/A
granpar/A
ingraŧianir/A
xgremir/A
ingringolir/A
xgriŧolar/A
grostinar/A
guŧar/A
xguatarar/A
gustar/A
incensar/A
infornar/A
malinpresionar/A
interiŧir/A
invidiar/A
tranxíɉer/A
xɉavetar/A
inɉotar/A
kabalar/A
inkagar/A
kalibrar/A
kalomar/A
rekalŧitrar/A
kaneđar/A
inkankrenar/A
inkantar/A
kaparar/A
deskapriŧiar/A
inkarbonir/A
deskarnaŧar/A
skartar/A
kasegar/A
inkatarar/A
skatonar/A
kavar/A
skaveŧar/A
klonar/A
akòjer/A
skokonar/A
kolpar/A
skomenŧiar/A
sokónber/A
skonkuasar/A
konpónder/A
skontentar/A
konxeturar/A
deskórer/A
akordar/A
kordonar/A
skorsiđar/A
inkotegar/A
rekovèrđer/A
kréser/A
kritegar/A
krostenar/A
kuadrar/A
kubiar/A
kuestionar/A
inkukar/A
kupar/A
kuŧolar/A
lamentar/A
laorar/A
stralasar/A
xlavar/A
lekar/A
lestir/A
xlexerir/A
dexligar/A
lindar/A
livelar/A
dexloɉar/A
loxar/A
lusar/A
inmacar/A
mainar/A
xmalŧar/A
manestrar/A
mantegar/A
xmaraŧar/A
inmarmorir/A
inmascar/A
mastruŧar/A
stramaŧar/A
maxerar/A
meɉorar/A
emendar/A
ixmerdar/A
dexméter/A
skométer/A
militar/A
xmirar/A
mòjer/A
mòlđer/A
dexmontar/A
inmorar/A
morfir/A
inmortalar/A
promòver/A
muarar/A
premunir/A
mutir/A
nanir/A
inaspar/A
inegrir/A
nikiar/A
nolar/A
dexnoxelar/A
dexñarar/A
oceđar/A
okar/A
adonbrar/A
dexonorar/A
ordir/A
ornar/A
ostiar/A
spacaŧar/A
strapagar/A
inpaketar/A
paliđar/A
inpaludar/A
spanocar/A
parir/A
rekonparir/A
partir/A
inparŧialiđar/A
paseɉar/A
pasturar/A
rinpatriar/A
inpaveɉar/A
spekular/A
trapelar/A
depenar/A
respénđer/A
dispensar/A
peotar/A
perletar/A
pestegar/A
petegolar/A
despetrir/A
inpiagar/A
renpiànđer/A
inpiegar/A
pincar/A
inpionbar/A
pironar/A
pitokar/A
plakar/A
poder/A
despoltronar/A
despóner/A
skonpóner/A
pontar/A
spontiñar/A
spopolar/A
sportelar/A
inpotar/A
spovolar/A
presar/A
despreŧiar/A
profesar/A
aprovar/A
espuñar/A
putanar/A
rabotar/A
inraixar/A
ranfar/A
rantolar/A
rastelar/A
reciđar/A
regonar/A
reñar/A
ribelar/A
inriŧar/A
roar/A
abrogar/A
rolar/A
interónper/A
rostir/A
rubregar/A
rumar/A
inruvidir/A
sagomar/A
deskonsakrar/A
saliđar/A
saludar/A
insaonar/A
insatanasar/A
scantinar/A
insear/A
sekolariđar/A
perseguir/A
suseguitar/A
seleđar/A
insemolar/A
resentir/A
deseparar/A
oservar/A
sevitar/A
sialakuar/A
simar/A
insinuar/A
situar/A
skandaliđar/A
deskarpiar/A
inskatolar/A
skicar/A
skoltar/A
skrimiatolar/A
skrivakiar/A
sofitar/A
solajar/A
somar/A
insoniar/A
sorsar/A
spaleđar/A
spatolar/A
spenotar/A
insospetir/A
spigolar/A
respirar/A
spolar/A
sprotonar/A
sorastar/A
instalar/A
stanpelar/A
istekar/A
stigar/A
istitikir/A
istivalar/A
instornir/A
stransir/A
restrénđer/A
stronŧar/A
strumar/A
strasuar/A
insuperbir/A
destajar/A
stanar/A
intardigar/A
tavernar/A
sorinténder/A
retentar/A
astèñer/A
terar/A
protestar/A
intitolar/A
sintoniđar/A
torniar/A
destràer/A
tranguɉar/A
straviar/A
stridar/A
stronkar/A
stusegar/A
interŧéder/A
reŧerkar/A
ŧigolar/A
ŧoetar/A
dexumanar/A
invagir/A
vantaxar/A
revéder/A
prevénder/A
interveñir/A
resovèñer/A
versar/A
reinvestir/A
vinar/A
víver/A
malvoler/A
stravòlxer/A
xavaɉar/A
konxeñar/A
xlankar/A
sprexudegar/A
